Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.120

Waiver of examination for initial applications.

The secretary shall waive the examination and credential a person authorized to practice within the state of Washington if the secretary determines that the person meets commonly accepted standards of education and experience for the profession. This section applies only to those individuals who file an application for waiver within one year of the establishment of the authorized practice.

[ 1991 c 3 s 265; 1987 c 150 s 72.]